Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions
31-1-14.
Physician Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment (POLST) forms.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility at the time of reference for the treatment and care of the patient.

“Authorized person” shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 31-39-2.

“Decision-making capacity” means the ability to understand and appreciate the nature and consequences of an order regarding end of life care decisions, including the benefits and disadvantages of such an order, and to reach an informed decision regarding the order.

“Health care facility” shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 31-32-2.

“Health care provider” shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 31-32-2.

“Life-sustaining procedures” means medications, machines, or other medical procedures or interventions which, when applied to a patient in a terminal condition or in a state of permanent unconsciousness, could in reasonable medical judgment keep the patient alive but cannot cure the patient and where, in the judgment of the attending physician and a second physician, death will occur without such procedures or interventions. The term “life-sustaining procedures” shall not include the provision of nourishment or hydration, but a patient may direct the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration in a POLST form. The term “life-sustaining procedures” shall not include the administration of medication to alleviate pain or the performance of any medical procedure deemed necessary to alleviate pain.

“Physician Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment form” or “POLST form” means a form executed pursuant to this Code section which provides directions regarding the patient’s end of life care.

“Provision of nourishment or hydration” means the provision of nutrition or fluids by tube or other medical means.

“State of permanent unconsciousness” means an incurable or irreversible condition in which the patient is not aware of himself or herself or his or her environment and in which the patient is showing no behavioral response to his or her environment.

“Terminal condition” means an incurable or irreversible condition which would result in the patient’s death in a relatively short period of time.

The department shall develop and make available a Physician Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment form. On and after July 1, 2016, the department shall notify the chairpersons and each member of the House Committee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee at least 60 days prior to implementing any modification of the POLST form. Such form shall provide directions regarding the patient’s end of life care and may be voluntarily executed by either a patient who has decision-making capacity and an attending physician or, if the patient does not have decision-making capacity, by the patient’s authorized person and an attending physician; provided, however, that this shall not prevent a health care facility from imposing additional administrative or procedural requirements regarding a patient’s end of life care decisions. A POLST form may be executed when a patient has a serious illness or condition and the attending physician’s reasoned judgment is that the patient will die within the next 365 days; provided, however, that a POLST form may be executed at any time if a person has been diagnosed with dementia or another progressive, degenerative disease or condition that attacks the brain and results in impaired memory, thinking, and behavior. A POLST form, if signed by an authorized person, shall indicate the relationship of the authorized person to the patient pursuant to paragraph (3) of Code Section 31-39-2.

A POLST form shall constitute a legally sufficient order that may be utilized by a health care provider or health care facility in accordance with its policies and procedures regarding end of life care. Such an order shall remain effective unless the order is revoked by the attending physician upon the consent of the patient or the patient’s authorized person. An attending physician who has issued such an order and who transfers care of the patient to another physician shall inform the receiving physician and the health care facility, if applicable, of the order. Review of the POLST form is recommended at care transitions, and such review should be specified on the form.

A POLST form signed by the patient and attending physician and indicating “allow natural death” or “do not resuscitate” or the equivalent may be implemented without restriction. If the POLST form (i) is signed by the attending physician and an authorized person instead of the patient and (ii) indicates “allow natural death” or “do not resuscitate” or the equivalent, in compliance with subsection (c) of Code Section 31-39-4, the POLST form may be implemented or become effective when the patient is a candidate for nonresuscitation, and such consent shall be based in good faith upon what such authorized person determines such candidate for nonresuscitation would have wanted had such candidate for nonresuscitation understood the circumstances under which such order is being considered.

A POLST form addressing interventions other than resuscitation and signed by the patient and attending physician may be implemented without restriction. If the POLST form is signed by an authorized person who is the health care agent named by the patient in an advance directive for health care and the attending physician, in compliance with paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Code Section 31-32-7, all treatment indications on the POLST form may be implemented. If the POLST form is signed by an authorized person who is not the health care agent named by the patient in an advance directive for health care, treatment indications on the POLST form may be implemented or become effective only when the patient is in a terminal condition or a state of permanent unconsciousness; provided, however, that a POLST form may become effective at any time if a person has been diagnosed with dementia or another progressive, degenerative disease or condition that attacks the brain and results in impaired memory, thinking, and behavior.

A POLST form shall be portable with the patient across care settings and shall be valid in any health care facility in which the patient who is the subject of such form is being treated; provided, however, that this shall not prevent a health care facility from imposing additional requirements regarding a patient’s end of life care decisions. A health care facility and a health care provider, in its discretion, may rely upon a POLST form as legally valid consent by the patient to the terms therein.

A copy of a POLST form shall be valid and have the same meaning and effect as the original document.

A physician orders for life-sustaining treatment form which was executed in another state, which is valid under the laws of such state and which is substantially similar to the Georgia POLST form, and contains signatures of (i) either the patient or an authorized person and (ii) the attending physician, shall be treated as a POLST form which complies with this Code section.

Each health care provider, health care facility, and any other person who acts in good faith reliance on a POLST form shall be protected and released to the same extent as though such provider, facility, or other person had interacted directly with the patient as a fully competent person. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following specific provisions shall also govern, protect, and validate the acts of an authorized person and each such health care provider, health care facility, and any other person acting in good faith reliance on such POLST form:

No such health care provider, health care facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for complying with a patient’s end of life care decisions as provided in a POLST form, even if death or injury to the patient ensues;

No such health care provider, health care facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for failure to comply with a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form, so long as such health care provider, health care facility, or person promptly informs the patient or the patient’s authorized person of such health care provider’s, health care facility’s, or person’s refusal or failure to comply with such patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form. The authorized person shall then be responsible for arranging the patient’s transfer to another health care provider or health care facility. A health care provider, health care facility, or person who is unwilling to comply with a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form shall continue to provide reasonably necessary consultation and care in connection with the pending transfer;

If the actions of a health care provider, health care facility, or person who fails to comply with a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form are substantially in accord with reasonable medical standards at the time of reference and such provider, facility, or person cooperates in the transfer of the patient, then the health care provider, health care facility, or person shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct for failure to comply with such patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form;

No authorized person who, in good faith, acts with due care for the benefit of the patient and in accordance with a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form, or who fails to act, shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for such action or inaction; and

If a POLST form is revoked, a person shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for acting in good faith reliance upon a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form unless such person had actual knowledge of the revocation.

No person shall be civilly liable for failing or refusing in good faith to effectuate a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration.

No physician or any person acting under a physician’s direction and no health care facility or any agent or employee thereof who, acting in good faith in accordance with the requirements of this Code section, causes the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration from a patient or who otherwise participates in good faith therein shall be subject to any civil or criminal liability or guilty of unprofessional conduct therefor.

Any person who participates in the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration pursuant to a patient’s end of life care decisions in a POLST form and who has actual knowledge that such POLST form has been properly revoked shall not have any civil or criminal immunity otherwise granted under this subsection for such conduct.

In the event there are any directions in a patient’s previously executed living will, advance directive for health care, durable power of attorney for health care, do not resuscitate order, or other legally authorized instrument that conflict with the directions in a POLST form, the most recent instrument will take precedence to the extent of the conflict.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize any act prohibited by Code Section 16-5-5. Any health care provider, health care facility, or any other person who violates Code Section 16-5-5 shall not be entitled to any civil immunity provided pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 305, § 1/SB 109; Ga. L. 2016, p. 757, § 1/SB 305; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, Code Section 31-1-14, as enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 312, § 2/SB 126, was redesignated as Code Section 31-1-15.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

31-1-15.
Storage, maintenance, control, and oversight of auto-injectable epinephrine by certain authorized entities.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Authorized entity” means any entity or organization, other than a school subject to Code Section 20-2-776.2, in connection with or at which allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, as identified by the department. The department shall, through rule or other guidance, identify the types of entities and organizations that are considered authorized entities no later than January 1, 2016, and shall review and update such rule or guidance at least annually thereafter. For purposes of illustration only, such entities may include, but are not limited to, restaurants, recreation camps, youth sports leagues, theme parks and resorts, and sports arenas.

“Auto-injectable epinephrine” means a single-use device used for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.

“Health care practitioner” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, an advanced practice registered nurse acting pursuant to the authority of Code Section 43-34-25, and a physician assistant acting pursuant to the authority of subsection (e.1) of Code Section 43-34-103.

An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply of auto-injectable epinephrine pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with Code Section 26-4-116.1. Such auto-injectable epinephrine shall be stored in a location readily accessible in an emergency and in accordance with the auto-injectable epinephrine’s instructions for use and any additional requirements that may be established by the department. An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who have completed the training required by subsection (d) of this Code section to be responsible for the storage, maintenance, control, and general oversight of auto-injectable epinephrine acquired by the authorized entity.

An employee or agent of an authorized entity, or any other individual, who has completed the training required by subsection (d) of this Code section may use auto-injectable epinephrine prescribed pursuant to Code Section 26-4-116.1 to:

Provide auto-injectable epinephrine to any individual who the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, or to the parent, guardian, or caregiver of such individual, for immediate administration, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for auto-injectable epinephrine or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy; and

Administer auto-injectable epinephrine to any individual who the employee, agent, or other individual believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for auto-injectable epinephrine or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy.

An employee, agent, or other individual described in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section shall complete an anaphylaxis training program and repeat such training at least every two years following completion of the initial anaphylaxis training program. Such training shall be conducted by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment or an entity or individual approved by the department. Training may be conducted online or in person and, at a minimum, shall cover:

How to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;

Standards and procedures for the storage and administration of auto-injectable epinephrine; and

Emergency follow-up procedures.

An authorized entity that possesses and makes available auto-injectable epinephrine and its employees, agents, and other individuals; a health care practitioner that prescribes or dispenses auto-injectable epinephrine to an authorized entity; a pharmacist or health care practitioner that dispenses auto-injectable epinephrine to an authorized entity; and an individual or entity that conducts the training described in subsection (d) of this Code section shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from any act or omission taken pursuant to this Code section; provided, however, that this immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting willful or wanton misconduct. The administration of auto-injectable epinephrine in accordance with this Code section is not the practice of medicine or any other profession that otherwise requires licensure. This Code section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that may be available under state law, including that provided under Code Section 51-1-29. An entity located in this state shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from the provision or administration of auto-injectable epinephrine outside of this state if the entity:

Would not have been liable for such injuries or related damages had the provision or administration occurred within this state; or

Is not liable for such injuries or related damages under the law of the state in which such provision or administration occurred.

An authorized entity that possesses and makes available auto-injectable epinephrine shall submit to the department, on a form developed by the department, a report including each incident on the authorized entity’s premises that involves the administration of auto-injectable epinephrine pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section and any other information deemed relevant by the department. The department shall annually publish a report that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted to it under this subsection.

The department shall establish requirements regarding the storage, maintenance, control, and oversight of the auto-injectable epinephrine, including but not limited to any temperature limitations and expiration of such auto-injectable epinephrine.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 312, § 2/SB 126.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, Code Section 31-1-14, as enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 312, § 2/SB 126, was redesignated as Code Section 31-1-15.

31-1-16.
Reporting information concerning nurses holding multistate licenses.

The Board of Community Health shall require health care providers and entities that employ one or more nurses holding a multistate license pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 26 of Title 43 for 30 days or more in a calendar year to report to such board the name, address, and duration of employment of each such nurse in a form and pursuant to a schedule established by such board. The Board of Community Health shall provide such information to the Georgia Board of Nursing.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 219, § 7/SB 168.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2019.

31-1-17.
Notification of dense breast tissue.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Dense breast tissue” means heterogeneously or extremely dense breast tissue based on nationally recognized guidelines or systems for breast imaging reporting of mammography including, but not limited to, the Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System established by the American College of Radiology.

“Health care facility” means a hospital, outpatient department, clinic, radiology practice, or mobile unit; an office of a physician; or other medical facility.

If a patient’s mammogram demonstrates dense breast tissue, the health care facility that conducted the mammogram shall provide notification to the patient that includes, but is not limited to, the following information, in the summary of the results of a mammography examination that is sent directly to a patient pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 263b:

“Your mammogram shows that your breast tissue is dense. Dense breast tissue is very common and is not abnormal. However, dense breast tissue can make it more difficult to detect cancer through a mammogram. Also, dense breast tissue may increase your risk for breast cancer. This information about the result of your mammogram is given to you to increase your awareness. Use this information to talk with your health care provider about whether other supplemental tests in addition to your mammogram may be appropriate for you, based on your individual risk. A report of your results was sent to your ordering physician. If you are self-referred, a report of your results was sent to you in addition to this summary.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 336, § 2/HB 62.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references.

Breast cancer patient care, §

33-24-70

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, this Code Section enacted as Code Section 31-1-16 was redesignated as Code Section 31-1-17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 336, § 1/HB 62, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Margie’s Law.’ ”

U.S. Code.

Section 263b of 42 U.S.C., referred to in subsection (b), concerns the certification of mammography facilities.

31-1-18.
Individuals with high risk for breast cancer; consumer information.

As used in this Code section, the term “individual with a high risk for breast cancer” means an individual:

With a lifetime risk of breast cancer of 20 percent or greater as according to a risk assessment tool based primarily on family history, such as but not limited to, the Tyrer-Cuzick Version 8.0b model;

With a known BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation based on genetic testing;

Who has not had genetic testing, but has a first-degree relative with a BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation;

Who has had radiation therapy to the chest between ten and 30 years of age; and

Who has Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome, or Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome or has a first-degree relative who has any such syndrome.

The department, in consultation with the Georgia Composite Medical Board, shall identify and compile information on factors and pertinent history to identify individuals with a high risk for breast cancer. Such information shall be reviewed annually and updated, if necessary.

The information identified and compiled pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be posted in a prominent location on the department’s website for the purpose of providing consumers with information on pertinent family history and other factors that should be provided to an individual’s physician to determine whether someone is an individual with a high risk for breast cancer. Such information shall also be annually distributed by the Georgia Composite Medical Board to all physicians licensed to practice medicine in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 796, § 2/HB 1125.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Cross references.

Breast cancer screening coverage for individuals with high risk of breast cancer, § 48-18-4.1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 796, § 1/HB 1125, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Lacee’s Law.’ ”

31-1-19
Prohibition on expenditure or use of state resources to advocate for or intend to influence citizens in support of Medicaid expansion under the federal Affordable Care Act.

Neither the state nor any department, agency, bureau, authority, office, or other unit of the state nor any political subdivision of the state shall expend or use moneys, human resources, or assets to advocate or intended to influence the citizens of this state in support of the voluntary expansion by the State of Georgia of eligibility for medical assistance in furtherance of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148, beyond the eligibility criteria in effect on April 15, 2014, under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this Code section in accordance with Article V, Section III, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prevent an officer or employee of the State of Georgia or of any department, agency, bureau, authority, office, unit, or political subdivision thereof from advocating or attempting to influence public policy:

As part of such person’s official duties;

When acting on personal time without using state resources; or

When providing bona fide educational instruction about the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 in institutions of higher learning or otherwise.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to preclude the state from participating in any Medicaid program.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 243, § 1-2/HB 943; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52; Code 1981, §

31-1-19

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 31/HB 1428.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, redesignated former Code Section 31-1-40 as this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, “April 15, 2014,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” near the end of subsection (a).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “Medicaid” was substituted for “MEDICAID” near the end of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 243, § 1-1/HB 943, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Health Care Freedom Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Health Care Freedom Act,” see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 113 (2014).

For note, “A Compelling Interest?
Using Old Conceptions of Public Health Law to Challenge the Affordable Care Act’s Contraceptive Mandate,” see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 613 (2015).

For note, “Charting the Middle Course:
An Argument for Robust But Well-Tailored Health Care Discrimination Protection for the Transgender Community,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 225 (2017).

31-1-20 through 31-1-22.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1585, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 692, § 1/SB 81, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 692, § 1/SB 81 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2005.

31-1-23.
Blindness education, screening, and treatment program.

Subject to availability of funds voluntarily donated and transmitted to the department for such purposes pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 40-5-25, the department shall develop a blindness education, screening, and treatment program to provide blindness prevention education and to provide screening and treatment for residents who do not have adequate coverage for such services under a health benefit plan.

Funds voluntarily donated and transmitted to the department pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 40-5-25 shall be expended only for purposes of the program provided by this Code section.

The program shall provide for:

Public education about blindness and other eye conditions;

Screenings and eye examinations to identify conditions that may cause blindness; and

Treatment procedures necessary to prevent blindness.

The department may contract for program development with any department approved nonprofit organization dealing with regional and community blindness education, eye donor, and vision treatment services.

The department by regulation shall prescribe eligibility requirements for the program.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 537, § 1.

Cross references.

Funds for operation of schools for deaf and blind persons, §

20-2-302

.

Georgia Industries for the Blind, T. 30, C. 2.

Aid to the blind, §

49-4-50

et seq.

31-1-24.
Organ transplant protections for individuals with disabilities; civil relief for violations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Anatomical gift” means a donation of any part or all of a human body conditioned upon the donor’s death for the purpose of transplantation or transfusion.

“Auxiliary aids or services” means an aid or service that is used to provide information to an individual with a cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability and is available in a format or manner that allows such individual to better understand such information. An auxiliary aid or service may include:

Qualified interpreters or other effective methods of making aurally delivered materials available to individuals with hearing impairments;

Qualified readers, taped texts, texts in accessible electronic format, or other effective methods of making visually delivered materials available to individuals with visual impairments; or

Supported decision-making services, including:

The use of a support personnel to communicate information to the individual with a disability, ascertain the wishes of such individual, or assist such individual in making decisions;

The disclosure of information to a legal guardian, authorized representative, or another individual designated by the individual with a disability for such purpose, so long as the disclosure is consistent with state and federal law, including the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq., and any regulations promulgated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services to implement such Act;

When an individual with a disability has a court appointed guardian or other person responsible for making medical decisions on behalf of such individual, any measures used to ensure that the individual is included in decisions involving the individual’s health care and that medical decisions are in accord with the individual’s own expressed interests; and

Any other aid or service that is used to provide information in a format that is easily understandable and accessible to individuals with cognitive, neurological, developmental, or intellectual disabilities, including any form of communication technology.

“Covered entity” means:

Any licensed provider of health care services, including licensed health care practitioners, hospitals, nursing facilities, laboratories, intermediate care facilities, psychiatric residential treatment facilities, institutions for individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities, and such licensed individuals or facilities providing health care services to incarcerated persons with disabilities; and

Any entity responsible for matching anatomical gift donors to potential recipients.

“Disability” has the same meaning as provided for in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended by the ADA Amendments Act of 2008, 42 U.S.C. Section 12102.

“Organ transplant” means the transplantation or transfusion of a part of a human body into the body of another human for the purpose of treating or curing a medical condition.

“Qualified recipient” means an individual who has a disability and meets the essential eligibility requirements for the receipt of an anatomical gift with or without any of the following:

Individuals or entities available to support and assist the recipient with an anatomical gift or transplantation;

Auxiliary aids or services; or

Reasonable modifications to the policies, practices, or procedures of a covered entity, including modifications to allow for either or both of the following:

Communication with one or more individuals or entities available to support or assist with the recipient’s care and medication after surgery or transplantation; or

Consideration of support networks available to the recipient, including family, friends, and home and community based services, including home and community based services funded through Medicaid, Medicare, another health plan in which the recipient is enrolled, or any program or source of funding available to the recipient, when determining whether the recipient is able to comply with posttransplant medical requirements.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to all stages of the organ transplant process.

A covered entity shall not, solely on the basis of an individual’s disability:

Consider the individual ineligible to receive an anatomical gift or organ transplant;

Deny medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including diagnostic services, evaluation, surgery, counseling, and postoperative treatment and services;

Refuse to refer the individual to a transplant center or other related specialist for the purpose of being evaluated for or receiving an organ transplant;

Refuse to place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list;

Place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list at a lower priority position than the position at which the individual would have been placed if such individual did not have a disability; or

Refuse insurance coverage for any procedure associated with being evaluated for or receiving an anatomical gift, including posttransplantation and posttransfusion care.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of this subsection, a covered entity may take an individual’s disability into account when making treatment or coverage recommendations or decisions, solely to the extent that the individual’s disability has been found by a physician, following an evaluation of such individual, to be medically significant to the provision of the anatomical gift.

If an individual has the necessary support system to assist such individual in complying with posttransplant medical requirements, a covered entity may not consider the individual’s inability to independently comply with posttransplant medical requirements to be medically significant for the purposes of paragraph (3) of this subsection.

A covered entity shall make reasonable modifications to its policies, practices, or procedures to allow individuals with disabilities access to transplantation related services, including diagnostic services, surgery, coverage, postoperative treatment, and counseling, unless the entity can demonstrate that making such modifications would fundamentally alter the nature of such services.

A covered entity must take steps necessary to ensure that an individual with a disability is not denied medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including diagnostic services, surgery, postoperative treatment, or counseling, due to the absence of auxiliary aids or services, unless the covered entity demonstrates that taking the steps would fundamentally alter the nature of the medical services or other services related to organ transplantation or would result in an undue burden for the covered entity.

Nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to require a covered entity to make a referral or recommendation for or perform a medically inappropriate organ transplant.

A covered entity shall comply with the requirements of Titles II and III of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended by the ADA Amendments Act of 2008, 42 U.S.C. Section 12102.

When it appears that a covered entity has violated or is violating any provision of this Code section, the affected individual may commence a civil action for injunctive and other equitable relief against such covered entity for purposes of enforcing compliance with this Code section. Such action may be brought in the district court for the county where the affected individual resides or resided or was denied the organ transplant or referral.

In an action brought under paragraph (1) of this Code section, the court shall give priority on its docket and expedited review, and may grant injunctive or other equitable relief, including:

Requiring auxiliary aids or services to be made available for a qualified recipient;

Requiring the modification of a policy, practice, or procedure of a covered entity; or

Requiring facilities be made readily accessible to and usable by a qualified recipient.

Nothing in this Code section is intended to limit or replace available remedies under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, or any other applicable law.

This Code section does not create a right to compensatory or punitive damages against a covered entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-3/HB 128.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-1/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘Gracie’s Law.’”

Ga. L. 2021, p. 546, § 1-2/HB 128, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) A mental or physical disability does not diminish a person’s right to health care;

“(2) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., prohibits discrimination against persons with disabilities, yet many individuals with disabilities still experience discrimination in accessing critical health care services;

“(3) In other states, individuals with physical or mental disabilities have been denied lifesaving organ transplants based on assumptions that their lives are less worthy, that they are incapable of complying with posttransplant medical requirements, or that they lack adequate support systems to ensure compliance with posttransplant medical requirements;

“(4) Although organ transplant centers shall consider medical and psychosocial criteria when determining if a patient is suitable to receive an organ transplant, transplant centers that participate in Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally funded programs are required to use patient selection criteria that result in a fair and nondiscriminatory distribution of organs; and

“(5) Georgia residents in need of organ transplants are entitled to assurances that they will not encounter discrimination on the basis of a disability.”

31-1-40.
[Renumbered] Redesignated.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 243, § 1-2/HB 943; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52; .

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. HB 1428, § 31/HB 1428, effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, redesignated former Code Section 31-1-40 as present Code Section 31-1-19.